Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2176.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Social Media Literacy Education.--(a) The standards adopted by the State Board of Education in accordance with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment) shall include:(1) The effects of social media and mobile device usage on students, including potential mental, psychological and physical impacts.(2) The potential impacts of social media and mobile device 12345678910111213141516171819 usage on academic growth and learning.(3) How to use social media safely, including how to identify suspicious online behavior such as cyberbullying, predatory behavior and potential human trafficking.(4) How to maintain personal security on mobile devices.(b) The State Board of Education may review the existing State standards for health, safety and physical education, as specified in 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 to revise the standards as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.(c) The department shall:(1) Develop and make available to school entities and nonpublic schools materials on social media literacy.(2) Make available social media literacy programming in the continuing professional education hours developed in accordance with section 1205.2(f).(d) Nothing in this section shall supersede or preempt any provision of a collective bargaining agreement between a school entity and an employe organization.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" shall mean a nonprofit school, other than a public school located within this Commonwealth, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and that meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.)."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate 20260HB2176PN2826 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school operating in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2176PN2826 - 3 - 1234